District of Columbia statutes.
31-2502.38

Exceptions to licensing provisions.

The provisions of this chapter relating to the licensing of policy-writing agents, soliciting agents, salaried company employees, and brokers shall not apply to the sale of personal accident insurance in the ticket offices of railroad companies or other common carriers, or in the offices of travel bureaus, nor to the business of ocean marine insurance, nor to insurance covering the property of railroad companies and other common carriers engaged in interstate commerce.

Oct. 9, 1940, 54 Stat. 1080, ch. 792, ch. II, § 38
Feb. 22, 1958, 72 Stat. 26, Pub. L. 85-334, § 9
1973 Ed., § 35-1342.
1981 Ed., § 35-1542.
This section is referenced in § 31-2502.31.